Utah statutes.
77-28-2.   Department of Corrections -- Authority to transfer inmates.
The Department of Corrections may transfer an inmate (as defined in Article II
(d) of the Western Interstate Corrections Compact) to any institution within
or without this state if this state has entered into a contract or contracts
for the confinement of inmates in said institutions pursuant to Article III of
the Western Interstate Corrections Compact.
